Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-730
Diploma of high school equivalency; issuance by Commissioner of Education; conditions.

The Commissioner of Education may issue a diploma of high school equivalency conveying all the significance and privilege of a regular high school diploma to any person who is not a high school graduate if:

(1) The person is and has been a resident of Nebraska for at least thirty days immediately preceding application or if his or her final period of high school attendance during which credit was earned toward graduation was in a Nebraska high school;

(2) On the basis of such person's achievements in approved tests and other criteria deemed pertinent by the Commissioner of Education, there is reasonable certainty that he or she has attained the educational development and abilities of the typical high school graduate; and

(3) Such person is unable to secure a diploma from the high school he or she last attended.

Laws 1959, c. 399, § 1, p. 1358;

Laws 1969, c. 721, § 2, p. 2750;

Laws 1975, LB 449, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,147.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 404;

Laws 2026, LB745, § 1.
July 18, 2026